pt-PT: Ponto/técnica do padrão de missangas: Croché com contas; Bordado com contas; Tecelagem de contas (vários pontos/sortido); Ponto tijolo; Ponto ziguezague (chevron); Peiote circular; Peiote de contagem par; Espinha de peixe (Ndebele); Trabalho com contas Kumihimo; Ponto escada; Trabalho com contas em tear; Ponto rede; Peiote de contagem ímpar; Ponto peiote; Trama em ângulo reto (RAW); Ponto espiral; Ponto quadrado; Enrolamento de fio de arame com contas; Outro
vi: Mũi/kỹ thuật đính hạt trong mẫu: Móc hạt cườm; Thêu đính hạt; Đan hạt (nhiều kiểu đan/hỗn hợp); Đan kiểu xếp gạch; Đan kiểu zích zắc (Chevron); Đan peyote vòng tròn; Đan peyote số chẵn; Đan kiểu xương cá (Ndebele); Đan hạt Kumihimo; Đan kiểu bậc thang; Đan hạt bằng khung dệt; Đan lưới hạt cườm; Đan peyote số lẻ; Đan kiểu peyote; Đan vuông góc (RAW); Đan xoắn ốc; Đan hình vuông; Quấn dây đồng với hạt cườm; Khác
cs: Steh/technika korálkového vzoru: Háčkování s korálky; Vyšívání s korálky; Šití z korálků (více stehů / různé); Cihlový steh; Chevronový steh; Kruhový peyote; Peyote se sudým počtem; Herringbone (Ndebele); Korálkování Kumihimo; Žebříkový steh; Korálkování na stavu; Síťování; Peyote s lichým počtem; Peyote steh; Pravoúhlý steh (RAW); Spirálový steh; Čtvercový steh; Ovíjení drátkem s korálky; Jiné
pl: Ścieg/technika koralikowa we wzorze: Szydełkowanie koralikami; Haft koralikowy; Tkanie z koralików (wiele ściegów/różne); Ścieg brick (murkowy); Ścieg szewronowy; Peyote okrągły; Peyote parzysty; Ścieg jodełkowy (Ndebele); Kumihimo z koralikami; Ścieg drabinkowy; Tkanie na krosnach z koralikami; Siatka; Peyote nieparzysty; Ścieg peyote; Splot prostopadły (RAW); Ścieg spiralny; Ścieg kwadratowy; Owijanie drutem (wire wrapping) z koralikami; Inne
sk-SK: Steh/technika korálkového vzoru: Korálkové háčkovanie; Korálkové vyšívanie; Tkanie korálok (viacero stehov/rôzne); Tehlový steh; Steh chevron; Kruhový peyote; Párový peyote; Rybia kosť (Ndebele); Korálkovanie kumihimo; Rebríkový steh; Korálkovanie na krosnách; Sieťovanie; Nepárový peyote; Peyote steh; Pravouhlý výplet (RAW); Špirálový steh; Štvorcový steh; Opletanie drôtom s korálkami; Iné
zh-CN: 串珠图案针法/技巧: 串珠钩编; 串珠刺绣; 串珠编织（多针法/什锦）; 砖块针法; 人字针法; 圆形 Peyote 针法; 偶数 Peyote 针法; 人字编织 (Ndebele); 组纽串珠编织; 梯形针法; 织机串珠; 网状编织; 奇数 Peyote 针法; Peyote 针法; 直角编织 (RAW); 螺旋针法; 方形针法; 金属线绕珠; 其他
ja: ビーズ模様のステッチ／技法: ビーズクロッシェ; ビーズ刺繍; ビーズウィービング (マルチステッチ/アソート); ブリックステッチ; シェブロンステッチ; サーキュラーペヨーテ; 偶数目ペヨーテ; ヘリンボーン (ンデベレ); 組み紐ビーズ; ラダーステッチ; ビーズ織り; ネッティング; 奇数目ペヨーテ; ペヨーテステッチ; ライトアングルウィーヴ (RAW); スパイラルステッチ; スクエアステッチ; ビーズを使ったワイヤーラッピング; その他
ru: Техника схемы бисероплетения: Вязание с бисером; Вышивка бисером; Бисероплетение (несколько техник/ассорти); Кирпичное плетение; Шевронное плетение; Круговое мозаичное плетение; Четное мозаичное плетение; Плетение «елочка» (ндебеле); Плетение кумихимо с бисером; Лестничное плетение; Ткачество бисером; Сетчатое плетение; Нечетное мозаичное плетение; Мозаичное плетение; Монастырское плетение (RAW); Спиральное плетение; Квадратное плетение; Плетение из проволоки с бисером; Другое
es: Puntada/técnica de bordado con cuentas: Crochet con cuentas; Bordado con cuentas; Tejido con cuentas (múltiples puntadas/surtidas); Puntada de ladrillo; Puntada de chevrón; Peyote circular; Peyote de número par; Espina de pescado (Ndebele); Kumihimo con cuentas; Puntada de escalera; Tejido con cuentas en telar; Red; Peyote de número impar; Puntada de peyote; Tejido en ángulo recto (RAW); Puntada en espiral; Puntada cuadrada; Envoltura de alambre con cuentas; Otro
fr: Point ou technique de perlage: Crochet avec perles; Broderie de perles; Tissage de perles (multi-points/assortis); Point brique; Point chevron; Peyote circulaire; Peyote pair; Point chevron (Ndebele); Tressage de perles Kumihimo; Point d'échelle; Tissage sur métier; Point de filet; Peyote impair; Point peyote; Tissage à angle droit (RAW); Point spirale; Point carré; Enroulement de fil avec perles; Autre
el: Βελονιά/τεχνική μοτίβου με χάντρες: Πλέξιμο χαντρών με βελονάκι; Κέντημα με χάντρες; Ύφανση χαντρών (πολλαπλές βελονιές/διάφορες); Βελονιά τούβλου (brick stitch); Βελονιά σεβρόν; Κυκλικό peyote; Peyote άρτιου αριθμού; Ψαροκόκαλο (Ndebele); Kumihimo με χάντρες; Βελονιά σκάλας; Χάντρες σε αργαλειό; Διχτυωτή ύφανση (netting); Peyote μονού αριθμού; Βελονιά peyote; Ύφανση ορθής γωνίας (RAW); Σπειροειδής βελονιά; Τετράγωνη βελονιά; Τύλιγμα με σύρμα και χάντρες; Άλλο
lt-LT: Karoliukų vėrimo dygsnio / technikos tipas: Nėrimas karoliukais; Siuvinėjimas karoliukais; Karoliukų audimas (kelių raštų / mišrus); Plytų raštas; Ševrono raštas; Žiedinis pejoto raštas; Lyginis pejoto raštas; Eglutės raštas („Ndebele“); „Kumihimo“ karoliukų vėrimas; Kopėtėlių raštas; Vėrimas staklėmis; Tinklinis raštas; Nelyginis pejoto raštas; Pejoto raštas; Stačiakampis audimas (RAW); Spiralinis raštas; Kvadratinis raštas; Vėlimas viela su karoliukais; Kita
en: Beading pattern stitch/technique: Bead crochet; Bead embroidery; Bead weaving (multi-stitch/assorted); Brick stitch; Chevron stitch; Circular peyote; Even-count peyote; Herringbone (Ndebele); Kumihimo beading; Ladder stitch; Loom beading; Netting; Odd-count peyote; Peyote stitch; Right-angle weave (RAW); Spiral stitch; Square stitch; Wire wrapping with beads; Other
sv: Pärlmönster – stygn/teknik: Pärlvirkning; Pärlbroderi; Pärlvävning (flera stygn/blandat); Tegelstygn; Chevronstygn; Cirkulär peyote; Jämn peyote; Fiskbensstygn (Ndebele); Kumihimo med pärlor; Stegstygn; Pärlvävning med vävstol; Nätstygn; Udda peyote; Peyotestygn; RAW-teknik (right-angle weave); Spiralstygn; Fyrkantsstygn; Trådlindning med pärlor; Övrigt
nl: Rijgpatroon steek/techniek: Kralenhaken; Kralenborduren; Kralenweven (meerdere steken/geassorteerd); Baksteensteek; Chevronsteek; Ronde peyote; Peyote met even aantal; Herringbone (Ndebele); Kumihimo met kralen; Laddersteek; Kralen weven op weefraam; Netsteek; Peyote met oneven aantal; Peyotesteek; Right-angle weave (RAW); Spiraalsteek; Vierkantsteek; Wire wrapping met kralen; Overig
th: รูปแบบลวดลายและเทคนิคการร้อยลูกปัด: ถักโครเชต์ลูกปัด; ปักลูกปัด; ร้อยลูกปัดแบบสาน (หลายลาย/ผสม); ลาย Brick stitch; ลายเชฟรอน; ลาย Peyote แบบวงกลม; ลาย Peyote จำนวนคู่; ลาย Herringbone (Ndebele); ร้อยลูกปัดคูมิฮิโมะ; ลายขั้นบันได; ร้อยลูกปัดด้วยกี่; ลายตาข่าย; ลาย Peyote จำนวนคี่; ลาย Peyote; ลายสานมุมฉาก (RAW); ลายเกลียว; ลายตาราง; พันลวดกับลูกปัด; อื่นๆ
da: Perlemønstersting/-teknik: Perlehækling; Perlebroderi; Perlevævning (flere sting/assorteret); Murstenssting; Chevron-sting; Cirkulær peyote; Lige peyote; Sildeben (Ndebele); Kumihimo med perler; Stigesting; Perlevævning; Netsting; Ulige peyote; Peyote-sting; RAW (Right-angle weave); Spiralsting; Firkantede sting; Wire wrapping med perler; Andet
hu: Gyöngyfűzési minta öltése/technikája: Gyöngyhorgolás; Gyöngyhímzés; Gyöngyszövés (többöltéses/vegyes); Téglaöltés; Chevron öltés; Körkörös peyote; Páros peyote; Halszálka (Ndebele); Kumihimo gyöngyfűzés; Létraöltés; Szövőkeretes gyöngyfűzés; Hálós öltés; Páratlan peyote; Peyote öltés; Derékszögű öltés (RAW); Spirálöltés; Négyzetöltés; Drótozás gyöngyökkel; Egyéb
pt-BR: Ponto/técnica do padrão de miçangas: Crochê com miçangas; Bordado com miçangas; Tecelagem de miçangas (vários pontos/variados); Ponto tijolo (brick stitch); Ponto chevron; Peyote circular; Peyote par; Ponto espinha de peixe (Ndebele); Kumihimo com miçangas; Ponto escada; Tear de miçangas; Ponto rede; Peyote ímpar; Ponto peyote; Trama em ângulo reto (RAW); Ponto espiral; Ponto quadrado; Enrolamento de arame com miçangas; Outro
zh-TW: 串珠圖案針法/技巧: 串珠鉤針; 串珠刺繡; 串珠編織 (多種針法/混合); 磚塊編織; 人字針法; 圓形佩奧特編織; 偶數佩奧特編織; 人字編織 (Ndebele); 組紐串珠; 梯形編織; 織布機串珠; 網狀編織; 奇數佩奧特編織; 佩奧特編織; 直角編織 (RAW); 螺旋編織; 方形編織; 串珠金屬線編織; 其他
nb: Perlemønstersting/-teknikk: Perlehekling; Perlebroderi; Perleveving (fler-sting/assortert); Mursteinssting; Chevron-sting; Sirkulær peyote; Peyote i partall; Fiskebeinsmønster (Ndebele); Kumihimo-perling; Stigesting; Perleveving på vevstol; Netting; Peyote i oddetall; Peyote-sting; Rettvinklet veving (RAW); Spiralsting; Firkantsting; Trådvikling med perler; Annet
de: Stich-/Technikart des Perlenmusters: Perlenhäkeln; Perlenstickerei; Perlenweben (mehrere Stiche/gemischt); Brick Stitch; Chevron-Stich; Rundes Peyote; Peyote (gerade Anzahl); Herringbone (Ndebele); Kumihimo mit Perlen; Leiterstich; Webrahmen-Perlenweben; Netztechnik; Peyote (ungerade Anzahl); Peyote-Stich; Right-Angle Weave (RAW); Spiralstich; Square Stitch; Wire Wrapping mit Perlen; Sonstige
ko: 비즈 패턴 스티치/기법: 비즈 크로셰; 비즈 자수; 비즈 위빙(멀티 스티치/어소트); 브릭 스티치; 쉐브론 스티치; 서큘러 페이요트; 이븐 카운트 페이요트; 헤링본(은데벨레); 쿠미히모 비즈 공예; 래더 스티치; 룸 비즈 공예; 네팅; 오드 카운트 페이요트; 페이요트 스티치; 라이트 앵글 위브(RAW); 스파이럴 스티치; 스퀘어 스티치; 비즈 와이어 래핑; 기타
sl-SI: Vzorec/tehnika za izdelavo okraskov s perlicami: Kvačkanje s perlami; Vezenje s perlami; Tkanje s perlami (več vbodov/različno); Opečni šiv; Šiv ševron; Krožni šiv peyote; Sodi šiv peyote; Ribja kost (Ndebele); Nizanje perl Kumihimo; Lestvičasti šiv; Nizanje perl na statvah; Izdelava mreže; Lihi šiv peyote; Šiv peyote; Pravokotno tkanje (RAW); Spiralni šiv; Kvadratni šiv; Ovijanje žice s perlami; Drugo
fi: Helmikirjontakuvion ommel/tekniikka: Helmivirkkaus; Helmikudonta; Helmikudonta (monipisto/lajitelma); Tiilipisto; Polveikepisto; Pyöreä peyote; Tasaparinen peyote; Kalanruoto (Ndebele); Kumihimo-helmityö; Tikaspisto; Helmikudonta kangaspuilla; Verkkotekniikka; Pariton peyote; Peyote-pisto; Suorakulmatekniikka (RAW); Spiraalipisto; Neliöpisto; Rautalankapunonta helmillä; Muu
tr: Boncuk işleme deseni dikişi/tekniği: Boncuk kroşe; Boncuk işlemesi; Boncuk dokuma (çoklu dikiş/çeşitli); Tuğla örgüsü; Şivron örgüsü; Dairesel peyote; Çift sayılı peyote; Balıksırtı (Ndebele); Kumihimo boncuk işleme; Merdiven örgüsü; Tezgâhta boncuk işleme; Ağ işi; Tek sayılı peyote; Peyote örgüsü; Dik açılı dokuma (RAW); Sarmal örgü; Kare örgü; Boncuklu tel sarma; Diğer
hr-HR: Bod/tehnika uzorka za nizanje tehnika: Heklanje s perlama; Vezenje perlama; Tkanje perlama (više bodova / raznovrsno); Bod cigle; Cik-cak bod; Kružni peyote bod; Parni peyote bod; Bod riblje kosti (Ndebele); Kumihimo pletenje perlama; Bod ljestvi; Nizanje perli na tkalačkom stanu; Mreža; Neparni peyote bod; Peyote bod; Pletenje pod pravim kutom (RAW); Spiralni bod; Kvadratni bod; Omatanje žicom s perlama; Ostalo
it: Motivo di perline punto/tecnica: Uncinetto con perline; Ricamo con perline; Tessitura di perline (punti multipli/assortiti); Punto mattone; Punto chevron; Peyote circolare; Peyote pari; Spina di pesce (Ndebele); Tessitura con perline Kumihimo; Punto scala; Tessitura al telaio con perline; Rete di perline; Peyote dispari; Punto peyote; Tessitura ad angolo retto (RAW); Punto spirale; Punto quadrato; Lavorazione a filo (wire wrapping) con perline; Altro
bg-BG: Техника/бод за моделиране с мъниста: Плетене на една кука с мъниста; Бродерия с мъниста; Тъкане на мъниста (различни бодове/микс); Тухлен бод; Шеврон бод; Кръгъл пейот бод; Четен пейот бод; Бод рибена кост (Ндебеле); Кумихимо с мъниста; Стълбовиден бод; Мъниста на стан; Мрежест бод; Нечетен пейот бод; Пейот бод; Бод под прав ъгъл (RAW); Спирален бод; Квадратен бод; Оплитане с тел и мъниста; Друго
ro-RO: Cusătură/tehnică pentru modelul de mărgele: Croșetare cu mărgele; Broderie cu mărgele; Țesere cu mărgele (cusătură multiplă/asortată); Cusătură tip cărămidă; Cusătură în zig-zag (chevron); Peyote circular; Peyote cu număr par; Herringbone (Ndebele); Kumihimo cu mărgele; Cusătură tip scară; Mărgelit la război; Împletitură de plasă; Peyote cu număr impar; Cusătură peyote; Cusătură în unghi drept (RAW); Cusătură spiralată; Cusătură pătrată; Împletire cu sârmă cu mărgele; Altele